Maryland, session 2026, HB1634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–412.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COLLECTIVE BARGAINING” MEANS:
(I) GOOD FAITH NEGOTIATIONS BY AUTHORIZED
REPRESENTATIVES OF EMPLOYEES AND THEIR EMPLOYER WITH THE INTENTION OF:
1. A. REACHING AN AGREEMENT ABOUT WAGES,
HOURS, AND OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1634*

HOUSE BILL 1634
B. INCORPORATING THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT IN
A WRITTEN MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING OR OTHER WRITTEN
UNDERSTANDING; OR
2. CLARIFYING TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT;
(II) ADMINISTRATION OF TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT; OR
(III) THE VOLUNTARY ADJUSTMENT OF A DISPUTE OR
DISAGREEMENT BETWEEN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVES OF EMPLOYEES AND
THEIR EMPLOYER THAT ARISES UNDER A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING OR
OTHER WRITTEN UNDERSTANDING.
(3) (I) “LABOR ORGANIZATION” MEANS:
1. AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS ACTIVELY SEEKING TO
REPRESENT OR IS REPRESENTING EMPLOYEES IN THE CANNABIS INDUSTRY; OR
2. AN AGENT OF AN ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED IN ITEM
1 OF THIS ITEM.
(II) “LABOR ORGANIZATION” INCLUDES:
1. AN ORGANIZATION OF ANY KIND, AN AGENCY, OR AN
EMPLOYEE REPRESENTATION COMMITTEE, GROUP, ASSOCIATION, OR PLAN:
A. IN WHICH EMPLOYEES IN THE CANNABIS INDUSTRY
PARTICIPATE; AND
B. THAT EXISTS, WHOLLY OR PARTLY, FOR THE PURPOSE
OF DEALING WITH EMPLOYERS CONCERNING GRIEVANCES, LABOR DISPUTES,
WAGES, RATES OF PAY, HOURS, OR OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT; AND
2. A CONFERENCE, GENERAL COMMITTEE, JOINT OR
SYSTEM BOARD, OR JOINT COUNCIL THAT IS SUBORDINATE TO A NATIONAL OR
INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATION TO WHICH AN ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH BELONGS.
(4) “LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT” MEANS AN AGREEMENT:

HOUSE BILL 1634 3
(I) BETWEEN AN ENTITY SEEKING A CANNABIS LICENSE OR A
CANNABIS LICENSEE AND A LABOR ORGANIZATION THAT, AT A MINIMUM, PROTECTS
THE STATE’S INTERESTS BY PROHIBITING THE LABOR ORGANIZATION FROM
ENGAGING IN PICKETING, WORK STOPPAGES, BOYCOTTS, OR ANY OTHER ECONOMIC
INTERFERENCE WITH THE OPERATION OF THE ENTITY SEEKING A CANNABIS
LICENSE OR THE CANNABIS LICENSEE WITHIN THE FIRST 5 YEARS OF THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF A LICENSE;
(II) THAT APPLIES TO ALL OPERATIONS CONDUCTED BY THE
APPLICANT OR LICENSEE AT A FACILITY OR LOCATION WHERE THE APPLICANT OR
LICENSEE CONDUCTS BUSINESS UNDER THE LICENSE; AND
(III) THAT IS VALID AND ENFORCEABLE UNDER 29 U.S.C. § 158.
(B) TO BE ISSUED A CANNABIS LICENSE, UNLESS THE APPLICANT OR
LICENSEE ALREADY HAS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT, THE APPLICANT
OR LICENSEE SHALL PRODUCE INFORMATION, DOCUMENTATION, AND ASSURANCES
TO ESTABLISH BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THE APPLICANT OR
LICENSEE HAS ENTERED INTO A LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT WITH EACH LABOR
ORGANIZATION THAT IS ACTIVELY ENGAGED IN REPRESENTING OR ATTEMPTING TO
REPRESENT CANNABIS INDUSTRY WORKERS IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.